California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) “Designated representative” means an individual to whom a license has been granted pursuant to Section 4053. A pharmacist fulfilling the duties of Section 4053 shall not be required to obtain a license as a designated representative.

(b) “Designated representative-in-charge” means a designated representative or designated representative-reverse distributor, or a pharmacist licensed in the home state proposed by a wholesaler or veterinary food-animal drug retailer and approved by the board as the supervisor or manager responsible for ensuring the wholesaler’s or veterinary food-animal drug retailer’s compliance with all state and federal laws and regulations pertaining to practice in the applicable license category.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 629, Sec. 7.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4022.6.

“Designated representative-reverse distributor” means an individual to whom a license has been granted pursuant to Section 4053.2, who is responsible for supervision over a licensed wholesaler that only acts as a reverse distributor. A pharmacist fulfilling the duties of Section 4053.2 shall not be required to obtain a license as a designated representative-reverse distributor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 598, Sec. 2.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4022.7.

(a) “Designated representative-3PL” means an individual to whom a license has been granted pursuant to Section 4053.1. A pharmacist fulfilling the duties of Section 4053.1 shall not be required to obtain a license as a designated representative-3PL.

(b) “Responsible manager” means a designated representative-3PL selected by a third-party logistics provider and approved by the board as responsible for ensuring compliance of the licensed place of business with state and federal laws with respect to dangerous drugs and dangerous devices received by, stored in, or shipped from the licensed place of business of the third-party logistics provider.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 629, Sec. 8.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4023.

“Device” means any instrument, apparatus, machine, implant, in vitro reagent, or contrivance, including its components, parts, products, or the byproducts of a device, and accessories that are used or intended for either of the following:

(a) Use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in a human or any other animal.

(b) To affect the structure or any function of the body of a human or any other animal.

For purposes of this chapter, “device” does not include contact lenses, or any prosthetic or orthopedic device that does not require a prescription.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 549, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4023.5.

For the purposes of this chapter, “direct supervision and control” means that a pharmacist is on the premises at all times and is fully aware of all activities performed by either a pharmacy technician or intern pharmacist.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 621, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

4024.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), “dispense” means the furnishing of drugs or devices upon a prescription from a physician, nurse practitioner practicing pursuant to Section 2837.103 or 2837.104, dentist, optometrist, podiatrist, veterinarian, or naturopathic doctor pursuant to Section 3640.7, or upon an order to furnish drugs or transmit a prescription from a certified nurse-midwife, nurse practitioner practicing pursuant to Section 2836.1, physician assistant, naturopathic doctor pursuant to Section 3640.5, or pharmacist acting within the scope of their practice.

(b) “Dispense” also means and refers to the furnishing of drugs or devices directly to a patient by a physician, nurse practitioner practicing pursuant to
 Section 2837.103 or 2837.104, dentist, optometrist, podiatrist, or veterinarian, or by a certified nurse-midwife, nurse practitioner practicing pursuant to Section 2836.1, naturopathic doctor, or physician assistant acting within the scope of their practice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 413, Sec. 22.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4025.

“Drug” means any of the following:

(a) Articles recognized in the official United States Pharmacopoeia, official National Formulary or official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, or any supplement of any of them.

(b) Articles intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in humans or other animals.

(c) Articles (other than food) intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of humans or other animals.

(d) Articles intended for use as a component of any article specified in subdivision (a), (b), or (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 549, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4025.1.

“Nonprescription drug” means a drug which may be sold without a prescription and which is labeled for use by the consumer in accordance with the requirements of the laws and rules of this state and the federal government.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 549, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4025.2.

“Nonprescription diabetes test device” means a glucose meter or test strip for use in the treatment of prediabetic or diabetic individuals that may be sold without a prescription and that is labeled for use by the consumer in accordance with the requirements of the laws and rules of this state and the federal government.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 139, Sec. 1.   (AB 602)   Effective July 31, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4026.

“Furnish” means to supply by any means, by sale or otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4026.5.

“Good standing” means a license issued by the board that is unrestricted by disciplinary action taken pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 695, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

4027.

(a) As used in this chapter, the terms “skilled nursing facility,” “intermediate care facility,” and other references to health facilities shall be construed with respect to the definitions contained in Article 1 (commencing with Section 1250) of Chapter 2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) As used in Section 4052.1, “licensed health care facility” means a facility licensed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 1250) of Chapter 2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code or a facility, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, operated by a health care service plan licensed pursuant to Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) As used in Section 4052.2, “health care facility” means a facility, other than a facility licensed under Division 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of the Health and Safety Code, that is owned or operated by a health care service plan licensed pursuant to Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of the Health and Safety Code, or by an organization under common ownership or control of the health care service plan; “licensed home health agency” means a private or public organization licensed by the State Department of Public Health pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1725) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, as further defined in Section 1727 of the Health and Safety Code; and “licensed clinic” means a clinic licensed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 1200) of Chapter 1 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) “Licensed health care
 facility” or “facility,” as used in Section 4065, means a health facility licensed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 1250) of Chapter 2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code or a facility that is owned or operated by a health care service plan licensed pursuant to Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code or by an organization under common ownership or control with the health care service plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 308, Sec. 42.   (SB 819)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4028.

“Licensed hospital” means an institution, place, building, or agency that maintains and operates organized facilities for one or more persons for the diagnosis, care, and treatment of human illnesses to which persons may be admitted for overnight stay, and includes any institution classified under regulations issued by the State Department of Public Health as a general or specialized hospital, as a maternity hospital, or as a tuberculosis hospital, but does not include a sanitarium, rest home, a nursing or convalescent home, a maternity home, or an institution for treating alcoholics.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 653, Sec. 21.   (SB 1489)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4029.

(a) “Hospital pharmacy” means and includes a pharmacy, licensed by the board, located within any licensed hospital, institution, or establishment that maintains and operates organized facilities for the diagnosis, care, and treatment of human illnesses to which persons may be admitted for overnight stay and that meets all of the requirements of this chapter and the rules and regulations of the board.

(b) A hospital pharmacy may include a pharmacy that is located in any physical plant that is regulated under the license of a general acute care hospital as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code. As a condition of licensure by the board, the pharmacy
 in another physical plant shall provide pharmaceutical services only to registered hospital patients who are on the premises of the same physical plant in which the pharmacy is located, except as provided in Article 7.6 (commencing with Section 4128). The pharmacy services provided shall be directly related to the services or treatment plan administered in the physical plant. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to restrict or expand the services that a hospital pharmacy may provide.

(c) “Hospital satellite compounding pharmacy” means an area licensed by the board to perform sterile compounding that is separately licensed by the board pursuant to Section 4127.15 to perform that compounding and is located outside of the hospital in another physical plant that is regulated as a general acute care hospital as defined in
 subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 623, Sec. 1.   (SB 351)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4030.

“Intern pharmacist” means a person issued a license pursuant to Section 4208.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 695, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

4031.

“Laboratory” means a research, teaching, or testing laboratory not engaged in the dispensing or furnishing of drugs or devices but using dangerous drugs or dangerous devices for scientific or teaching purposes. Every laboratory shall maintain an established place of business and keep purchase records. Every laboratory shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 549, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4032.

“License” means and includes any license, permit, registration, certificate, or exemption issued by the board and includes the process of applying for and renewing the same.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4033.

(a) (1) “Manufacturer” means and includes every person who prepares, derives, produces, compounds, or repackages any drug or device except a pharmacy that manufactures on the immediate premises where the drug or device is sold to the ultimate consumer.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), “manufacturer” shall not mean a pharmacy compounding a drug for parenteral therapy, pursuant to a prescription, for delivery to another pharmacy for the purpose of delivering or administering the drug to the patient or patients named in the prescription, provided that neither the components for the drug nor the drug are compounded, fabricated, packaged, or otherwise prepared prior
 to receipt of the prescription.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), “manufacturer” shall not mean a pharmacy that, at a patient’s request, repackages a drug previously dispensed to the patient, or to the patient’s agent, pursuant to a prescription.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), “manufacturer” also means a person who prepares, derives, manufactures, produces, or repackages a dangerous drug, as defined in Section 4022, device, or cosmetic. Manufacturer also means the holder or holders of a New Drug Application (NDA), an Abbreviated New Drug Application (ANDA), or a Biologics License Application (BLA), provided that such application has been approved; a private label distributor (including colicensed partners) for whom the private label distributor’s prescription drugs are originally manufactured and labeled for the distributor and have not been repackaged; or the distributor
 agent for the manufacturer, contract manufacturer, or private label distributor, whether the establishment is a member of the manufacturer’s affiliated group (regardless of whether the member takes title to the drug) or is a contract distributor site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 492, Sec. 1.   (SB 600)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4034.

“Outsourcing facility” means a facility that meets all of the following:

(a) Is located within the United States of America at one address that is engaged in the compounding of sterile drugs and nonsterile drugs.

(b) Has registered as an outsourcing facility with the federal Food and Drug Administration under Section 503B of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 353b).

(c) Is doing business within or into California.

(d) Is licensed with the board as an outsourcing facility pursuant to Article 7.7 (commencing with
 Section 4129).

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 484, Sec. 15.   (SB 1193)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4034.5.

An “emergency medical services automated drug delivery system” or “EMSADDS” means an automated drug delivery system that stores and distributes drugs for the sole purpose of restocking a secured emergency pharmaceutical supplies container that is used by an emergency medical services agency to provide emergency medical services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 647, Sec. 1.   (SB 443)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4035.

“Person” includes, but is not limited to, firm, association, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, state governmental agency, trust, or political subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 484, Sec. 16.   (SB 1193)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4036.

“Pharmacist” means a natural person to whom a license has been issued by the board, under Section 4200, except as specifically provided otherwise in this chapter. The holder of an unexpired and active pharmacist license issued by the board is entitled to practice pharmacy as defined by this chapter, within or outside of a licensed pharmacy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 6.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4036.5.

“Pharmacist-in-charge” means a pharmacist proposed by a pharmacy and approved by the board as the supervisor or manager responsible for ensuring the pharmacy’s compliance with all state and federal laws and regulations pertaining to the practice of pharmacy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 308, Sec. 43.   (SB 819)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4037.

(a) “Pharmacy” means an area, place, or premises licensed by the board in which the profession of pharmacist is practiced and where prescriptions are compounded. “Pharmacy” includes, but is not limited to, any area, place, or premises described in a license issued by the board wherein controlled substances, dangerous drugs, or dangerous devices are stored, possessed, prepared, manufactured, derived, compounded, or repackaged, and from which the controlled substances, dangerous drugs, or dangerous devices are furnished, sold, or dispensed at retail.

(b) “Pharmacy” shall not include any area in a facility licensed by the State Department of Public Health where floor supplies, ward
 supplies, operating room supplies, or emergency room supplies of dangerous drugs or dangerous devices are stored or possessed solely for treatment of patients registered for treatment in the facility or for treatment of patients receiving emergency care in the facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 7.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4038.

(a) “Pharmacy technician” means an individual who assists a pharmacist in a pharmacy in the performance of their pharmacy related duties, as specified in Section 4115.

(b) A “pharmacy technician trainee” is a person who is enrolled in a pharmacy technician training program operated by a California public postsecondary education institution or by a private postsecondary vocational institution approved by the Bureau for Private Postsecondary and Vocational Education or an accredited employer-based pharmacy technician training program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 8.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4039.

“Physicians,” “dentists,” “optometrists,” “pharmacists,” “doctors of podiatric medicine,” “veterinarians,” “veterinary surgeons,” “registered nurses,” “naturopathic doctors,” and “physician assistants” are persons authorized by a currently valid and unrevoked license to practice their respective professions in this state. “Physician” means and includes any person holding a valid and unrevoked physician’s and surgeon’s certificate or certificate to practice medicine and surgery, issued by the Medical Board of California or the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, and includes an unlicensed person lawfully practicing medicine pursuant to Section 2065, when acting within the scope of that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 629, Sec. 9.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4040.

(a) “Prescription” means an oral, written, or electronic transmission order that is both of the following:

(1) Given individually for the person or persons for whom ordered that includes all of the following:

(A) The name or names and address of the patient or patients.

(B) The name and quantity of the drug or device prescribed and the directions for use.

(C) The date of issue.

(D) Either rubber stamped, typed, or printed by hand or typeset, the
 name, address, and telephone number of the prescriber, the
 prescriber’s license classification, and the prescriber’s federal registry number, if a controlled substance is prescribed.

(E) A legible, clear notice of the condition or purpose for which the drug is being prescribed, if requested by the patient or patients.

(F) If in writing, signed by the prescriber issuing the order, or the certified nurse-midwife, nurse practitioner, physician assistant, or naturopathic doctor who issues a drug order pursuant to Section 2746.51, 2836.1, 3502.1, or 3640.5, respectively, or the pharmacist who issues a drug order pursuant to Section 4052, 4052.1, 4052.2, or 4052.6.

(2) Issued by a physician, dentist, optometrist, doctor of podiatric medicine, veterinarian, nurse practitioner
 practicing pursuant to Section 2837.103 or 2837.104, or naturopathic doctor pursuant to Section 3640.7 or, if a drug order is issued pursuant to Section 2746.51, 2836.1, 3502.1, or 3460.5, by a certified nurse-midwife, nurse practitioner, physician assistant, or naturopathic doctor licensed in this state, or pursuant to Section 4052, 4052.1, 4052.2, or 4052.6 by a pharmacist licensed in this state.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a written order of the prescriber for a dangerous drug, except for any Schedule II controlled substance, that contains at least the name and signature of the prescriber, the name and address of the patient in a manner consistent with paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 11164 of the Health and Safety Code, the name and quantity of the drug prescribed, directions for use, and the date of issue may be
 treated as a prescription by the dispensing pharmacist as long as any additional information required by subdivision (a) is readily retrievable in the pharmacy. In the event of a conflict between this subdivision and Section 11164 of the Health and Safety Code, Section 11164 of the Health and Safety Code shall prevail.

(c) “Electronic transmission prescription” includes both image and data prescriptions. “Electronic image transmission prescription” means any prescription order for which a facsimile of the order is received by a pharmacy from a licensed prescriber. “Electronic data transmission prescription” means any prescription order, other than an electronic image transmission prescription, that is electronically transmitted from a licensed prescriber to a pharmacy.

(d) The use of commonly used abbreviations shall not invalidate an otherwise valid prescription.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 9.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4040.5.

“Reverse distributor” means every person who acts as an agent for pharmacies, drug wholesalers, third-party logistics providers, manufacturers, and other entities by receiving, inventorying, warehousing, and managing the disposition of outdated or nonsaleable dangerous drugs or dangerous devices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 598, Sec. 3.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4040.6.

“Self-assessment process” means the process of self-evaluation of a facility’s compliance with state and federal laws as a means to promote compliance through self-examination and education. The self-assessment process shall be performed on a form approved by the board in consultation with stakeholders and posted on its internet website.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 10.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4041.

“Veterinary food-animal drug retailer” is an area, place, or premises, other than a pharmacy, that holds a valid license from the Board of Pharmacy of the State of California as a wholesaler and, in and from which veterinary drugs for food-producing animals are dispensed pursuant to a prescription from a licensed veterinarian. “Veterinary food-animal retailer” includes, but is not limited to, any area, place, or premises described in a permit issued by the board wherein veterinary food-animal drugs, as defined in Section 4042, are stored, possessed, or repackaged, and from which veterinary drugs are furnished, sold, or dispensed at retail pursuant to a prescription from a licensed veterinarian.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4042.

“Veterinary food-animal drugs” as used in this chapter shall include the following:

(a) Any drug to be used in food-producing animals bearing the legend, “Caution, federal law restricts this drug to use by or on the order of a licensed veterinarian” or words of similar import.

(b) Any other drug as defined in Section 14206 of the Food and Agricultural Code that is used in a manner that would require a veterinary prescription.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4043.

“Wholesaler” means and includes a person who acts as a wholesale merchant, broker, jobber, customs broker, reverse distributor, agent, or a nonresident wholesaler, who sells for resale, or negotiates for distribution, or takes possession of, any drug or device included in Section 4022. Unless otherwise authorized by law, a wholesaler may not store, warehouse, or authorize the storage or warehousing of drugs with any person or at any location not licensed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 507, Sec. 4.   (AB 2605)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4044.

“Repackager” means a person or entity that is registered with the federal Food and Drug Administration as a repackager and operates an establishment that packages finished drugs from bulk or that repackages dangerous drugs into different containers, excluding shipping containers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 713, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

4044.3.

(a) “Remote dispensing site pharmacy” means a licensed pharmacy located in this state that is exclusively overseen and operated by a supervising pharmacy and staffed by one or more qualified registered pharmacy technicians, as defined in Section 4132, where pharmaceutical care services, including, but not limited to, the storage and dispensing of prescription drugs and controlled substances, drug regimen review, and patient counseling, are remotely monitored or provided, or both, by a licensed pharmacist through the use of telepharmacy
 technology.

(b) Unless otherwise specified in this chapter, a remote dispensing site pharmacy shall comply with all state and federal laws regulating the practice of pharmacy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 548, Sec. 2.   (AB 401)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4044.5.

“Reverse third-party logistics provider” means an entity that processes or manages the disposition of an outdated or nonsaleable dangerous drug or dangerous device on behalf of a manufacturer, wholesaler, or dispenser of the dangerous drug or dangerous device, but does not take ownership of the dangerous drug or dangerous device nor have the responsibility to direct its sale or disposition. Unless otherwise specified in this chapter, every provision of this chapter that applies to a third-party logistics provider shall also apply to a reverse third-party logistics provider.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 507, Sec. 5.   (AB 2605)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4044.6.

(a) “Supervising pharmacy” means a licensed pharmacy located in this state that is owned and operated by a person or persons where the majority of the beneficial interest in, as well as the management and control, resides with at least one board-licensed pharmacist, as defined in Section 4036, that exclusively oversees the operations of a remote dispensing site pharmacy.

(b) A supervising pharmacy shall be exclusively responsible for the operation of the remote dispensing site pharmacy and its employees pursuant to Section 4131.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 548, Sec. 3.   (AB 401)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4044.7.

“Telepharmacy” means a system that is used by a supervising pharmacy for the purpose of monitoring the dispensing of prescription drugs by a remote dispensing site pharmacy and provides for related drug regimen review and patient counseling by an electronic method, including, but not limited to, the use of audio, visual, still image capture, and store and forward technology.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 548, Sec. 4.   (AB 401)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4045.

“Third-party logistics provider” means an entity that provides or coordinates warehousing or other logistics services for a dangerous drug or dangerous device in intrastate or interstate commerce on behalf of a manufacturer, wholesaler, or dispenser of the dangerous drug or dangerous device, but does not take ownership of the dangerous drug or dangerous device, nor have responsibility to direct its sale or disposition.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 507, Sec. 7.   (AB 2605)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4046.

“Surplus medication collection and distribution intermediary” means a firm, association, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, state governmental agency, or political subdivision that performs the functions specified in Section 4169.5 for the purpose of a program established pursuant to Division 116 (commencing with Section 150200) of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   (AB 467)   Effective April 9, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Scope of Practice and Exemptions [4050. - 4069.]

4050.

(a) For the purposes of this section, “state agency” includes every state office, officer, department, division, bureau, board, authority, and commission.

(b) In recognition of and consistent with the decisions of the appellate courts of this state, the Legislature hereby declares the practice of pharmacy to be a profession.

(c) Pharmacist practice is a dynamic, patient-oriented health service that applies a scientific body of knowledge to improve and promote patient health by means of patient-care activities to optimize appropriate drug use, drug-related therapy, disease management and prevention, and communication for
 clinical and consultative purposes. Pharmacist practice is continually evolving to include more sophisticated and comprehensive patient care activities.

(d) The Legislature further declares that pharmacists are health care providers who have the authority to provide health care services.

(e) No state agency other than the board may define or interpret this chapter and its regulations for those licensed pursuant to this chapter or develop standardized procedures or protocols pursuant to this chapter, unless so authorized by this chapter, or specifically required under state or federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 11.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4051.

(a) For the purposes of this section, “accepted standard of care” means the degree of care a prudent and reasonable pharmacist licensed pursuant to this chapter, with similar education, training, experience, resources, and setting, would exercise in a similar situation.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, it is unlawful for any person to manufacture, compound, furnish, sell, or dispense a dangerous drug or dangerous device, or to dispense or compound a prescription pursuant to Section 4040 of a prescriber unless they are a pharmacist under this chapter.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, a pharmacist may authorize the
 initiation of a prescription, pursuant to Section 4052, 4052.1, 4052.2, or 4052.6, and otherwise provide clinical advice, services, information, or patient consultation, as set forth in this chapter, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The clinical advice, services, information, or patient consultation is provided to a health care professional or to a patient or a patient’s agent.

(2) The pharmacist has access to prescription, patient profile, or other relevant medical information for purposes of patient and clinical consultation and advice.

(3) Access to the information described in paragraph (2) is secure from unauthorized access and use.

(4) The pharmacist provides the service or activity consistent with the accepted standard of care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 12.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4052.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a pharmacist may do all of the following:

(1) Furnish a reasonable quantity of compounded drug product to a prescriber for office use by the prescriber.

(2) Transmit a valid prescription to another pharmacist.

(3) Administer drugs and biological products that have been ordered by a prescriber.

(4) Perform procedures or functions as authorized by
 Sections 4052.1 and 4052.2.

(5) Furnish epinephrine.

(6) Perform procedures or functions as authorized by Section 4052.6.

(7) Furnish, manufacture, measure, fit to the patient, or sell and repair dangerous devices, or furnish instructions to the patient or the patient’s representative concerning the use of those devices.

(8) Provide consultation, training, and education to patients about drug therapy, disease management, and disease prevention, and furnish over-the-counter medications if requested.

(9) Provide professional information, including clinical or pharmacological information, advice, or consultation to patients and health care professionals, and participate in multidisciplinary review of patient progress, including appropriate access to medical records.

(10) (A) Furnish FDA-approved or authorized medications as part of preventative health care services that do not require a diagnosis, including any of the following:

(i) Emergency contraception. A pharmacist shall not require a patient to provide individually identifiable medical information that is not specified in Section 1707.1 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations before initiating emergency contraception drug therapy pursuant to this subdivision.

(ii) Contraception.

(iii) Smoking cessation.

(iv) Travel medication.

(v) Anti-viral or anti-infective medications.

(B) The pharmacist shall notify the patient’s primary care provider of any drugs or devices furnished to the patient, or enter the appropriate information in a patient record system shared with the primary care provider, as permitted by that primary care provider. If the patient does not have a primary care provider, the pharmacist shall provide the patient with a written record of the drugs or devices furnished and advise the patient to consult a physician of the patient’s choice.

(C) Nothing in this section shall be construed as establishing an obligation on a pharmacist to report an over-the-counter medication sold to a patient that was not captured as a prescription.

(11) Order and interpret tests.

(12) Initiate, adjust, or discontinue drug therapy for a patient under either of the following:

(A) A collaborative practice agreement with any health care provider with prescriptive authority. The collaborative practice agreement may be between a single or multiple pharmacists and a single or multiple health care providers with prescriptive authority.

(B) An order or authorization made by the patient’s prescriber and in accordance with the policies, procedures, or protocols of the entity providing health care services, unless a patient’s treating prescriber otherwise prohibits the action.

(13) Furnish
 medication used to reverse opioid overdose and medication used to treat substance use disorder to the extent authorized by federal law.

(14) Complete missing information on a prescription for a noncontrolled medication if there is evidence to support the change.

(15) Initiate and administer immunizations for persons three years of age and older pursuant to this article.

(b) A pharmacist who is authorized to issue an order to initiate or adjust a controlled substance therapy pursuant to this section shall personally register with the federal Drug Enforcement Administration.

(c) This section does not affect the applicable requirements of law relating to either of the following:

(1) Maintaining the confidentiality of medical records.

(2) The licensing of a health care facility.

(d) Nothing in this section
 shall be construed as establishing an obligation on a pharmacist to perform or provide a service or function authorized by subdivision (a) if the pharmacist has made a professional determination that any of the following apply:

(1) The pharmacist lacks sufficient education, training, or expertise, or access to sufficient patient medical information, to perform the service or function properly or safely.

(2) Performing or providing the service or function would place a patient at risk.

(3) Pharmacist staffing at the pharmacy is insufficient to facilitate comprehensive patient care.

(e) A pharmacist shall notify a patient’s primary care provider of any drugs or devices
 furnished to the patient, or enter the
 appropriate information in a patient record system shared with the primary care provider, as permitted by that primary care provider. If the patient does not have a primary care provider or requests not to notify the primary care provider, the pharmacist shall provide the patient with a written or electronic record of the drugs or devices furnished and advise the patient to consult a physician of the patient’s choice.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed as establishing an obligation on a pharmacist to perform or provide authorized services without payment for the services, including payment directly by the patient, payment through a third-party payer, or payment of any required copayment by the patient.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 13.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4052.04.

(a) In addition to the authority provided in Section 4052, a pharmacist may furnish COVID-19 oral therapeutics following a positive test for SARS-CoV-2, the virus that causes COVID-19.

(b) Prior to furnishing COVID-19 oral therapeutics pursuant to subdivision (a), a pharmacist shall utilize relevant and appropriate evidence-based clinical guidelines published by the federal Food and Drug Administration in providing these patient care services.

(c) A pharmacist who furnishes COVID-19 oral therapeutics shall notify the patient’s primary care provider, or enter the appropriate information in a patient record system shared
 with the primary care provider, as permitted by that primary care provider. If the patient does not have a primary care provider, the pharmacist shall provide the patient with a written record of the drugs furnished and advise the patient to consult a physician of the patient’s choice.

(d) A pharmacist shall document, to the extent possible, the kind and amounts of COVID-19 oral therapeutics furnished pursuant to subdivision (a), as well as information regarding any testing services provided, in the patient’s record in the record system maintained by the pharmacy. The records shall be maintained for three years and shall be available for inspection by all properly authorized personnel of the board.

(e) For purposes of this section, “COVID-19 oral therapeutics” means drugs
 that are approved or authorized by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the treatment of COVID-19 and administered orally.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 17.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4052.05.
